North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-10.5 Soybean Council [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-10.5-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-02.
North Dakota soybean council — Membership — Election — Term. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-03.
Soybean districts — Establishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-04.
Meetings — Quorum — Compensation and expenses of council. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-05.
Expenditure of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-06.
Council powers and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-07.
Tax levies — Collection — Reports — Soybean fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-08.
Nonparticipating growers — Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 65, § 1.

4-10.5-09.
Advisory referendum by growers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-10.
Collection of unpaid assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-11.
Penalty for nonpayment of assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-12.
Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-13.
Records of council — Inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.5-14.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.